Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8309.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 27 of the General Laws entitled "INSURANCE" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 84
FEE SCHEDULE TRANSPARENCY AND FAIR BILLING ACT
27-84-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Fee Schedule Transparency and Fair
Billing Act.”
27-84-2. Publication of fee schedules.
(a) Every insurer shall publish and provide participating physicians, physician practices,
physician corporations, physician partnerships or any other entity providing medical services, with
a complete, current fee schedule listing the maximum allowable reimbursement for every covered
service and procedure code.
(b) Physicians, physician practices, physician corporations, physician partnerships or any
other entity providing medical services shall include, but not be limited to, those healthcare
providers in chapters 18, 19, 20 and 41 of title 27.
(c) Updates must be provided within thirty (30) days of any change via secure provider
portals.
27-84-3. Fair reimbursement.

An insurer shall reimburse any claim submitted at or below the published maximum
allowable rate in full, without requiring inflated “usual and customary” charges. No reductions,
bundling restrictions, or penalties shall be applied solely based on the charge amount when it does
not exceed the published maximum.
27-84-4. Insurer – Definition.
For purposes of this chapter, “insurer” means every nonprofit medical service corporation,
hospital service corporation, health maintenance organization, or other insurer offering and/or
insuring health services; the term shall in addition include any entity defined as an insurer under §
42-62-4.
27-84-5. Enforcement.
(a) The office of the health insurance commissioner shall oversee compliance and may
impose penalties of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation of this chapter.
(b) Annual reports on fee schedule availability and billing disputes shall be published by
the office of the health insurance commissioner by July 1 of each year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect ninety (90) days after passage.
========
LC006086
========
LC006086 - Page 2 of 3